District of Columbia statutes.
9-506

Extension of gas mains for maintenance of street lamps.

Each gas company in the District of Columbia shall, at its sole and entire expense, make reasonable extensions of its gas mains whenever the said extensions shall be necessary for maintaining street lamps for the public safety and comfort, and the Council of the District of Columbia shall regulate the location and depth of the said gas mains in the streets, avenues, roads, alleys, and spaces of the District of Columbia.

Mar. 3, 1893, 27 Stat. 544, ch. 199
May 29, 1928, 45 Stat. 996, ch. 901, § 1
1981 Ed., § 7-706.
1973 Ed., § 7-706.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 402(171) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.